trunk/apertium-tg-fa/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix.xml
    <pardef n="شم/ردن__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارید</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ار</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ردیم</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ردم</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ردید</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ردی</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ردند</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>رد</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اریم</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارم</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارید</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اری</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارند</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارد</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اریم</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارم</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارید</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اری</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارند</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارد</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارید</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ار</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ردیم</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ردم</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ردید</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ردی</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ردند</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>رد</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اریم</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارم</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارید</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اری</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارند</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارد</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اریم</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارم</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارید</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اری</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارند</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ارد</l>
          <r>ردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="شمردن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>شم</i><par n="شم/ردن__vblex"/></e>
